North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-25.1 Child Abuse and Neglect
50-25.1-15.
Abandoned infant — Approved location procedure — Reporting immunity. [Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this section:

“Abandoned infant” means an infant who has been abandoned at birth at a hospital or before reaching the age of one year regardless of the location of birth and who has been left with an on-duty staff member at an approved location in an unharmed condition.

“Approved location” means a hospital or other location as designated by administrative rule adopted by the department.

“Hospital” means a facility licensed under chapter 23-16.

A parent of an infant under the age of one year, or an agent of the parent with the parent’s consent, may leave the infant with an on-duty staff member at an approved location. Neither the parent nor the agent is subject to prosecution under sections 14-07-15 and 14-09-22 for leaving an abandoned infant.

An approved location shall accept an infant left under this section. The approved location may request information regarding the parents and shall provide the parent or the agent with a medical history form and an envelope with the approved location’s return address. If a hospital accepting the infant has the infant’s medical history, the hospital is not required to provide the parent or the agent with a medical history form. Neither the parent nor the agent is required to provide any information.

If an infant is left at a hospital, the hospital shall provide the parent or the agent with a numbered identification bracelet to link the parent or the agent to the infant, unless due to birth of the infant, the infant and parent currently have an identification bracelet. Possession of an identification bracelet does not entitle the bracelet holder to take custody of the infant on demand. If an individual possesses a bracelet linking the individual to an infant left at a hospital under this section and parental rights have not been terminated, possession of the bracelet creates a presumption that the individual has standing to participate in a protection services action brought under this chapter or chapter 27-20.3. Possession of the bracelet does not create a presumption of maternity, paternity, or custody.

The approved location may provide the parent or the agent with any relevant information, including:

Information about the safe place for abandoned infant programs;

Information about adoption and counseling services; and

Information about whom to contact if reunification is sought.

Within twenty-four hours of receiving an infant under this section, the approved location shall report to the department or authorized agent, as required by section 50-25.1-03, that an infant has been left at the approved location. The report may not be made before the parent or the agent leaves the approved location.

The approved location and its employees and agents are immune from any criminal or civil liability for accepting an infant under this section.

Upon receiving a report of an abandoned infant under this section, the department or authorized agent shall proceed as required under this chapter if it appears that the abandoned infant was not harmed, except the department or authorized agent may not attempt to identify or contact the parent or the agent. If it appears the infant who was left was harmed, the department or authorized agent shall initiate a child protection assessment of the matter as required by law.

If an individual claiming to be the parent or the agent contacts the department or authorized agent and requests to be reunited with the infant who was left, the department or authorized agent may identify or contact the individual as required under this chapter and all other applicable laws. If an individual contacts the department or authorized agent seeking information only, the department or authorized agent may attempt to obtain information regarding the identity and medical history of the parents and may provide information regarding the procedures in a case involving an infant who was left at an approved location. The individual is under no obligation to respond to the request for information, and the department or authorized agent may not attempt to compel response to investigate the identity or background of the individual.

The department shall develop and implement a public awareness campaign to provide information, public service announcements, and educational materials regarding this section to the public, including medical providers, law enforcement, and social service agencies.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 434, § 1; 2019, ch. 416, § 9, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 417, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 245, § 41, § 41, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 377, § 21, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 470, effective September 1, 2022.

50-25.1-16.
Prenatal exposure to controlled substances — Reporting requirements.

An individual required to report under section 50-25.1-03 who has knowledge of or reasonable cause to suspect that a woman is pregnant and has used a controlled substance for a nonmedical purpose during the pregnancy shall report the circumstances to the department or authorized agent if the knowledge or suspicion is derived from information received by that individual in that individual’s official or professional capacity.

Any individual may make a voluntary report if the individual has knowledge of or reasonable cause to suspect that a woman is pregnant and has used a controlled substance for a nonmedical purpose during the pregnancy.

If a report alleges a pregnant woman’s use of a controlled substance for a nonmedical purpose, the department or authorized agent immediately shall initiate an appropriate assessment and offer services indicated under the circumstances. Services offered may include a referral for an addiction assessment, a referral for substance use disorder treatment if recommended, or a referral for prenatal care. The department or authorized agent may also take any appropriate action under chapter 25-03.1.

A report and assessment under this section is not required if the pregnant woman voluntarily enters treatment in a licensed treatment program. If the pregnant woman does not complete voluntary treatment or fails to follow treatment recommendations, an individual required to report under section 50-25.1-03 who has knowledge of the failure to complete voluntary treatment or failure to follow treatment recommendations shall make a report as required by this section.

A report under this section must be made as described in section 50-25.1-04 and must be sufficient to identify the woman, the nature and extent of use, if known, and the name and address of the individual making the report.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 431, § 2; 2019, ch. 225, § 16, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 377, § 22, effective August 1, 2021.

50-25.1-17.
Toxicology testing — Requirements.

If the woman has obstetrical complications that are a medical indication of possible use of a controlled substance for a nonmedical purpose, upon the consent of the pregnant woman, or without consent if a specimen is otherwise available, a physician shall administer a toxicology test to a pregnant woman under the physician’s care or to a woman under the physician’s care within eight hours after delivery to determine whether there is evidence that she has ingested a controlled substance. If the test results are positive, the physician shall report the results under section 50-25.1-03.1. A negative test result or the pregnant woman’s refusal to consent to a test does not eliminate the obligation to report under section 50-25.1-03 if other evidence gives the physician reason to believe the patient has used a controlled substance for a nonmedical purpose.

If a physician has reason to believe based on a medical assessment of the mother or the infant that the mother used a controlled substance for a nonmedical purpose during the pregnancy, the physician shall administer, without the consent of the child’s parents or guardian, to the newborn infant born under the physician’s care a toxicology test to determine whether there is evidence of prenatal exposure to a controlled substance. If the test results are positive, the physician shall report the results as neglect under section 50-25.1-03. A negative test result does not eliminate the obligation to report under section 50-25.1-03 if other medical evidence of prenatal exposure to a controlled substance is present.

A physician or any other medical personnel administering a toxicology test to determine the presence of a controlled substance in a pregnant woman, in a woman within eight hours after delivery, or in a child at birth or during the first month of life is immune from civil or criminal liability arising from administration of the test if the physician ordering the test believes in good faith that the test is required under this section and the test is administered in accordance with an established protocol and reasonable medical practice. A physician or any other medical personnel who determines in good faith not to administer a toxicology test under this section is immune from liability for not administering the test.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 431, § 3.

50-25.1-18.
Prenatal exposure to alcohol abuse — Reporting requirements.

An individual required to report under section 50-25.1-03 who has knowledge of or reasonable cause to suspect that a woman is pregnant and has abused alcohol after the woman knows of the pregnancy may:

Arrange for an addiction assessment conducted by a licensed treatment program and confirm that the recommendations indicated by the assessment are followed; or

Immediately report the circumstances to the department or authorized agent if the knowledge or suspicion is derived from information received by that individual in that individual’s official or professional capacity.

An individual may make a voluntary report if the individual has knowledge of or reasonable cause to suspect that a woman is pregnant and has abused alcohol during the pregnancy.

If the woman is referred for an addiction assessment under subdivision a of subsection 1 and fails to obtain an assessment or refuses to comply with the recommendations of the assessment, an individual required to report under section 50-25.1-03 who has knowledge of the failure to obtain the assessment or refusal to comply with recommendations of the assessment shall make a report to the department or authorized agent.

If a report alleges a pregnant woman has abused alcohol, the department or authorized agent shall immediately initiate an appropriate assessment and offer services indicated under the circumstances. Services offered may include a referral for an addiction assessment, a referral for substance use disorder treatment, if recommended, or a referral for prenatal care. The department or authorized agent may also take any appropriate action under chapter 25-03.1.

A report and assessment under this section is not required if the pregnant woman voluntarily enters treatment in a licensed treatment program. If the pregnant woman does not complete voluntary treatment or fails to follow treatment recommendations, an individual required to report under section 50-25.1-03 who has knowledge of the failure to complete voluntary treatment or failure to follow treatment recommendations shall make a report as required by this section.

A report under this section must be made as described in section 50-25.1-04 and must be sufficient to identify the woman, the nature and extent of the abuse of alcohol, any health risk associated with the abuse of alcohol, and the name and address of the individual making the report.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 431, § 4; 2019, ch. 225, § 17, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 377, § 23, effective August 1, 2021.

50-25.1-19.
Child protective services duties — Training requirements.

The department or authorized agent, at the initial time of contact with an individual subject to a child abuse or neglect assessment, shall advise the individual of the specific complaints or allegations made against the individual.

The department or authorized agent shall provide training to all representatives of the child protective services system regarding the legal duties of the representatives. The training may consist of various methods of informing the representatives of these duties, to protect the legal rights and safety of children and families from the initial time of contact during assessment through treatment.

The department shall adopt rules to implement the requirements of this section.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 435, § 1; 2021, ch. 377, § 24, effective August 1, 2021.

50-25.1-20.
Alternative response assessment — Compliance.

If an alternative response assessment is initiated as a result of a report of child abuse or neglect, a decision that a child is confirmed abused or neglected may not be made if the person responsible for the child’s welfare complies with the resulting referred services and plan of safe care for the substance exposed newborn. The department or authorized agent shall determine whether a person responsible for the child’s welfare has complied with the referred services and plan of safe care for the substance exposed newborn. If the department or authorized agent determines a person responsible for the child’s welfare has not complied with the referred services and plan of safe care for the substance exposed newborn, an assessment of the initial report of child abuse or neglect may be completed.

History.

S.L. 2017, ch. 343, § 5, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 377, § 25, effective August 1, 2021.

50-25.1-21.
Alternative response assessment — Services.

In response to an alternative response assessment, the department:

Shall provide referral services to, and monitor support services for, the person responsible for the child’s welfare, the substance exposed newborn, and other children under the same care as may be necessary for their well-being and safety;

Shall develop a plan of safe care for the substance exposed newborn; and

May take any appropriate action under chapter 25-03.1.

The department may discharge the powers and duties provided under this section through an authorized agent.

History.

S.L. 2017, ch. 343, § 6, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 377, § 26, effective August 1, 2021.

50-25.1-22.
Family services assessment — Compliance.

If a family services assessment is initiated as a result of a report of child abuse or neglect, a decision that a child is confirmed abused or neglected may not be made if a person responsible for the child’s welfare complies with the resulting referred services for the child. The department or authorized agent shall determine whether a person responsible for the child’s welfare has complied with the referred services. If the department or authorized agent determines a person responsible for the child’s welfare has not complied with the referred services for the child, a child protection assessment of the initial report of child abuse or neglect may be completed.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 416, § 6, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 377, § 27, effective August 1, 2021.

50-25.1-23.
Family services assessment — Services.

In response to a family services assessment, the department shall provide appropriate referral services to a person responsible for the child’s welfare and the children under the same care as may be necessary for the well-being and safety of the children.

The department may discharge the powers and duties provided under this section through an authorized agent.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 416, § 11, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 377, § 28, effective August 1, 2021.

50-25.1-24.
Evidence-based screening tool records — Confidentiality — Admissibility — Privileged.

Evidence-based screening tool records are confidential and may be only used for conducting a screening, treatment, referral for services, and receiving services.

Evidence-based screening tool records are not subject to section 50-25.1-11.

The department may release reports, data compilations, analyses, and summaries, which identify or analyze trends.

Evidence-based screening tool records are privileged and are not subject to subpoena or discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil or administrative action.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 416, §§ 10-12, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 377, § 27, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 245, § 39, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 467, § 468, effective September 1, 2022; 2021, ch. 377, § 1, eff August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, §§ 467, 468, eff September 1, 2022.